Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Chapter 16. Parole Administration.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska board of parole, see 22 AAC 20.

Sec. 33.16.010.
Parole.

A prisoner who is serving a term or terms of two years or more is eligible for mandatory parole.

A prisoner who is eligible under AS

33.16.090

may be granted discretionary parole by the board of parole.

Except as provided in (g) of this section, a prisoner who is not eligible for special medical or discretionary parole, or who is not released on special medical or discretionary parole, shall be released on mandatory parole for the term of good time deductions credited under AS 33.20, if the term or terms of imprisonment are two years or more.

A prisoner released on special medical, discretionary, or mandatory parole is subject to the conditions of parole imposed under AS

33.16.150

. Parole may be revoked under AS

33.16.220

.

A prisoner eligible under AS

33.16.085

may be released on special medical parole by the Parole Board.

[Repealed, § 72 ch 1 4SSLA 2017.]

A prisoner is not eligible for mandatory parole if the prisoner has been convicted of a crime under AS

11.41.100

or

11.41.110

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am §§ 1, 2 ch 77 SLA 1987; am §§ 2, 3 ch 70 SLA 1995; am §§
118 — 120 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§ 46, 47, 72 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§
103, 104 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(d)(7) and (m)(1) and (2), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For eligibility for discretionary parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 1.

For conditions of parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 5.

For discretionary parole release procedures, see 22 AAC 20, art. 6.

For mandatory parole release and revocation, see 22 AAC 20, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (c), inserted “special medical, administrative, or” in two places, following “eligible for” and “not released on”, respectively; in (d), inserted “administrative,” after “special medical,”; added former (f).

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (c), twice deleted “, administrative,” following “special medical”; in (d), deleted “administrative,” following “special medical,”; repealed (f).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, substituted “Except as provided in (g) of this section, a prisoner” for “A prisoner” at the beginning of (c), and added (g).

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(f),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to (c) and (g) of this section apply “to parole ordered on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 33.16.020.
Board of parole.

There is in the Department of Corrections a board of parole consisting of five members appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by a majority of members of the legislature in joint session.

Members of the board serve for staggered terms of five years and until their successors are appointed.

The governor shall choose the presiding officer of the board from among the membership.

The governor shall make appointments to the board with due regard for representation on the board of the ethnic, racial, sexual, and cultural populations of the state.

The governor shall appoint at least one member who resides in the First Judicial District, one member who resides in the Third Judicial District, and one member who resides in either the Second or Fourth Judicial District.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985)

Sec. 33.16.030.
Selection criteria for board members.

The governor shall appoint board members on the basis of their qualifications to make decisions that are compatible with the welfare of the community and of individual offenders. The governor shall appoint members who are able to consider the character and background of offenders and the circumstances under which offenses were committed.

At least one person appointed to the board must have experience in the field of criminal justice.

Officers or employees of the state may not be appointed to the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985)

Sec. 33.16.040.
Compensation and expenses.

A board member is entitled to compensation at an amount to be set by the governor for each day the member is participating in business of the board, and is also entitled to the per diem and travel allowances provided under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985)

Sec. 33.16.050.
Meetings of the board.

The board may meet as often as it considers necessary to carry out its responsibilities, but shall meet at least four times a year.

Three members of the board constitute a quorum for the conduct of business.

Except when a member of the board imposes special conditions of mandatory parole for the board under AS

33.16.150

and except as provided in (e) of this section, decisions and orders of the board require the affirmative votes of a majority of the members present.

The board may conduct meetings by the use of teleconferencing facilities.

A meeting of the board is not required for a decision or order setting special conditions of mandatory parole by a single member of the board under AS

33.16.150(b)

and (e). If a prisoner or parolee who is aggrieved by the board member’s decision or order applies to the full board under AS

33.16.150(e)

and

33.16.160

for a change in parole conditions, the board shall meet to act on the application.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am §§ 9, 10 ch 43 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

Sec. 33.16.060.
Duties of the board.

The board shall

serve as the parole authority for the state;

consider the suitability for parole of a prisoner who is eligible for discretionary parole or special medical parole if

the prisoner had no disciplinary action imposed during incarceration; or

the prisoner had disciplinary action imposed during incarceration and the prisoner filed an application with the board for discretionary or special medical parole;

impose parole conditions on all prisoners released under special medical, discretionary, or mandatory parole;

under AS

33.16.210

, discharge a person from parole when custody is no longer required;

maintain records of the meetings and proceedings of the board;

recommend to the governor and the legislature changes in the law administered by the board;

recommend to the governor or the commissioner changes in the practices of the department and of other departments of the executive branch necessary to facilitate the purposes and practices of parole;

upon request of the governor, review and recommend applicants for executive clemency; and

execute other responsibilities prescribed by law.

The board shall adopt regulations under the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62)

establishing standards under which the suitability of a prisoner for special medical or discretionary parole shall be determined;

providing for the supervision of parolees and for recommitment of parolees; and

governing procedures of the board.

The board shall establish a program for a parolee who has conditions of parole that include not consuming controlled substances or alcoholic beverages and who has been identified as being at moderate to high risk as identified by a risk-needs assessment. The program must

include random testing for controlled substance and alcoholic beverage use;

require that a parole officer file a parole violation report by the close of the next business day if a parolee

fails to appear for an appointment as directed by the parole officer; or

tests positive for the use of controlled substances or alcoholic beverages; and

include a means to notify the board by the close of the next business day that a parole violation report has been filed on a parolee placed in the program by the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 70 SLA 1995; am § 29 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 121 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 48 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 105 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For regulations relating to parole, see generally 22 AAC 20.

For provision authorizing the board of parole to adopt regulations necessary to implement (c) of this section, see sec. 39(b), ch. 83, SLA 2014.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to subsection (a), see sec. 185(d)(8), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For eligibility for discretionary parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 1.

For attendance and appearance at parole board adjudicatory hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 2.

For parole progress reports, see 22 AAC 20, art. 3.

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

For conditions of parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 5.

For discretionary parole release procedures, see 22 AAC 20, art. 6.

For mandatory parole release and revocation, see 22 AAC 20, art. 7.

For discharge from parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 8.

For parole rescission hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 9.

For hearing officers, see 22 AAC 20, art. 10.

For recording of hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 11.

For parole violations, see 22 AAC 20, art. 12.

For disclosure of information by board member, see 22 AAC 20, art. 13.

For disqualification of board member or hearing officer, see 22 AAC 20, art. 14.

For special medical parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 15.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, added (c).

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a)(2), deleted “upon receipt of an application,” at the beginning of the paragraph; inserted “for discretionary parole at least 90 days before the prisoner's first date of eligibility and upon receipt of the prisoner's application” following “who is eligible”; deleted “or discretionary” after “special medical”; in (a)(3), inserted “special medical, administrative,” preceding “discretionary”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (a)(3), deleted “administrative,” following “special medical,”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, rewrote (a)(2), which read, “consider the suitability for parole of a prisoner who is eligible for discretionary parole at least 90 days before the prisoner’s first date of eligibility and upon receipt of the prisoner’s application for special medical parole;”.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 36(b), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (c) as amended by sec. 29, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to convictions occurring before, on, or after July 17, 2014 for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(f), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment to (a) of this section applies “to parole ordered on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 33.16.070.
Process.

The board or a member of the board may issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum in the performance of board duties under AS

33.16.060(a)

.
Subpoenas issued under this section are enforceable in Superior Court.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For parole violations, see 22 AAC 20, art. 12.

Sec. 33.16.080.
Executive director.

The board shall hire an executive director to serve the board in the discharge of its duties. The executive director must have had training and experience in the field of criminal justice.
The executive director may employ additional staff to assist the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985)

Sec. 33.16.085.
Special medical parole.

Notwithstanding a presumptive, mandatory, or mandatory minimum term or sentence a prisoner may be serving or any restriction on parole eligibility under AS 12.55, a prisoner who is serving a term of at least 181 days may, upon application by the prisoner or the commissioner, be released by the board on special medical parole if the board determines that

the prisoner has not been convicted of an offense under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.425

or

11.41.434

—

11.41.438

and the prisoner is severely medically or cognitively disabled as certified in writing by a physician licensed under AS 08.64;

a reasonable probability exists that

the prisoner will live and remain at liberty without violating any laws or conditions imposed by the board;

because of the prisoner’s severe medical or cognitive disability, the prisoner will not pose a threat of harm to the public if released on parole; and

release of the prisoner on parole would not diminish the seriousness of the crime;

the prisoner

was not suffering from the severe medical or cognitive disability at the time the prisoner committed the offense or parole or probation violation for which the prisoner is presently incarcerated; or

was suffering from the severe medical or cognitive disability at the time the prisoner committed the offense or parole or probation violation for which the prisoner is presently incarcerated and the medical or cognitive disability has progressed so that the likelihood of the prisoner’s committing the same or a similar offense is low;

the care and supervision that the prisoner requires can be provided in a more medically appropriate or cost-effective manner than by the department;

the prisoner is incapacitated to an extent that incarceration does not impose significant additional restrictions on the prisoner;

the prisoner is likely to remain subject to the severe medical or cognitive disability throughout the entire period of parole or to die and there is no reasonable expectation that the prisoner’s medical or cognitive disability will improve noticeably; and

an appropriate discharge plan has been formulated that addresses basic life domains of the prisoner, including care coordination, housing, eligibility for public benefits, and health care, including necessary medication.

If the board finds a change in circumstances or discovers new information concerning a prisoner who has been granted a special medical parole release date, the board may rescind or revise the previously granted parole release date.

The board shall issue its decision to grant or deny special medical parole, or to rescind or revise the release date of a prisoner granted special medical parole, in writing and provide a basis for the decision. A copy of the decision shall be provided to the prisoner.

History.

(§ 5 ch 70 SLA 1995; am § 3 ch 25 SLA 2003; am § 27 ch 2 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For discretionary parole release procedures, see 22 AAC 20, art. 6.

For special medical parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 15.

Sec. 33.16.087.
Rights of victims in connection with special medical parole.

If the victim of a crime requests notice of a scheduled hearing to review or consider special medical parole for a prisoner convicted of that crime, the board shall send notice of the hearing to the victim at least 30 days before the hearing. The notice must be accompanied by a copy of the prisoner’s or commissioner’s application for parole submitted under AS

33.16.085

. The copy of the application sent to the victim must include the prisoner’s proposed residence and employment addresses.

A victim who requests notice under this section shall maintain a current, valid mailing address on file with the board. The board shall send the notice required by this section to the last known address of the victim. The victim’s address may not be disclosed to the prisoner or the prisoner’s attorney.

The victim has a right to attend meetings of the parole board in which the status of the prisoner convicted of the crime against that victim is officially considered and to comment, in writing or in person, on the proposed action of the board. Copies of any written comments shall be provided to the prisoner and the prisoner’s attorney before action by the board.

The board shall consider the comments presented under (c) of this section in deciding whether to release the prisoner on special medical parole.

If the victim requests, the board shall make every reasonable effort to notify the victim as soon as practicable in writing of its decision to grant or deny special medical parole. The notice under this subsection must include the expected date of the prisoner’s release, the geographic area in which the prisoner is required to reside, and other pertinent information concerning the prisoner’s conditions of parole that may affect the victim.

History.

(§ 5 ch 70 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 25 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For special medical parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 15.

Sec. 33.16.089.
Eligibility for administrative parole.

History.

[Repealed, § 72 ch 1 4SSLA 2017.]

Sec. 33.16.090.
Eligibility for discretionary parole and minimum terms to be served.

A prisoner sentenced to an active term of imprisonment of at least 181 days may, in the discretion of the board, be released on discretionary parole if the prisoner

has served the amount of time specified under (b) of this section, except that

a prisoner sentenced to one or more mandatory 99-year terms under AS

12.55.125(a)

or one or more definite terms under AS

12.55.125(l)

is not eligible for consideration for discretionary parole;

a prisoner is not eligible for consideration of discretionary parole if made ineligible by order of a court under AS

12.55.115

;

a prisoner imprisoned under AS

12.55.086

is not eligible for discretionary parole unless the actual term of imprisonment is more than one year;

a prisoner sentenced to a single sentence within or below a presumptive range set out in AS

12.55.125(c)

, (d)(2) — (4), (e)(3) and (4), or (i) who has not been allowed by the three-judge panel under AS

12.55.175

to be considered for discretionary parole release is not eligible for consideration of discretionary parole;

a prisoner sentenced to a single sentence, including a consecutive or partially consecutive sentence, that is not eligible for a good time deduction under AS

33.20.010(a)(3)

and that has not been allowed by the three-judge panel under AS

12.55.175

to be considered for discretionary parole release is not eligible for consideration of discretionary parole; or

is at least 60 years of age, has served at least 10 years of a sentence for one or more crimes in a single judgment, and has not been convicted of an unclassified felony or a sexual felony as defined in AS

12.55.185

.

A prisoner eligible under (a)(1) of this section who is sentenced

to a single sentence under AS

12.55.125(a)

or (b) may not be released on discretionary parole until the prisoner has served the mandatory minimum term under AS

12.55.125(a)

or (b),

two-thirds of the active term of imprisonment imposed, or any term set under AS

12.55.115

, whichever is greatest, for a conviction under AS

11.41.100

or

11.41.110

;

one-half of the active term of imprisonment imposed, or any term set under AS

12.55.115

, whichever is greatest, for a conviction for an offense not listed in (A) of this paragraph;

to a single sentence under AS

12.55.125(c)

, (d)(2) — (4), (e)(3) and (4), or (i), and has been allowed by the three-judge panel under AS

12.55.175

to be considered for discretionary parole release during the second half of the sentence, may not be released on discretionary parole until

the prisoner has served that portion of the active term of imprisonment required by the three-judge panel; and

in addition to the factors set out in AS

33.16.100(a)

, the board determines that

the prisoner has successfully completed all rehabilitation programs ordered by the three-judge panel that were made available to the prisoner; and

the prisoner would not constitute a danger to the public if released on parole;

to a single enhanced sentence under AS

12.55.155(a)

that is above the applicable presumptive range may not be released on discretionary parole until the prisoner has served the greater of the following:

an amount of time, less good time earned under AS

33.20.010

, equal to the upper end of the presumptive range plus one-fourth of the amount of time above the presumptive range; or

any term set under AS 12.55.115;

to a single sentence under any other provision of law may not be released on discretionary parole until the prisoner has served at least one-fourth of the active term of imprisonment, any mandatory minimum sentence imposed under any provision of law, or any term set under AS 12.55.115, whichever is greatest;

to concurrent sentences may not be released on discretionary parole until the prisoner has served the greatest of

any mandatory minimum sentence or sentences imposed under any provision of law;

any term set under AS 12.55.115; or

the amount of time that is required to be served under (1) — (4) or (7) of this subsection for the sentence imposed for the primary crime, had that been the only sentence imposed;

to consecutive or partially consecutive sentences may not be released on discretionary parole until the prisoner has served the greatest of

the composite total of any mandatory minimum sentence or sentences imposed under any provision of law, including AS

12.55.127

;

any term set under AS 12.55.115; or

the amount of time that is required to be served under (1) — (4) or (7) of this subsection for the sentence imposed for the primary crime, had that been the only sentence imposed, plus one-quarter of the composite total of the active term of imprisonment imposed as consecutive or partially consecutive sentences imposed for all crimes other than the primary crime;

to a single sentence under AS

12.55.125(d)

for an offense under AS

11.71.030(a)(2)

or (9), and has not been allowed by the three-judge panel under AS

12.55.175

to be considered for discretionary parole release, may not be released on discretionary parole until the prisoner has served one-half of the active term of imprisonment imposed.

As used in this section,

“active term of imprisonment” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.127

;

“primary crime” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.127

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am §§ 30 — 32 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 14 ch 7 SLA 1996; am §§ 5, 6 ch 125 SLA 2004; am § 28 ch 2 SLA 2005; am § 47 ch 41 SLA 2009; am §§
123, 124 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 49 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§
106, 107 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(d)(10) and (m)(3), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For eligibility for discretionary parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 1.

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (c)(1), substituted “AS

12.55.127

” for “AS

12.55.185

”.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), in the introductory language, inserted “and who has not been released on administrative parole as provided in AS

33.16.089

” following “181 days”; designated a portion of (a) as (1) and redesignated (a)(1), (2) and (3) as (a)(1)(A), (B) and (C); added (a)(2); in the introductory language of of (b), substituted “(a)(1)” for “(a)”; in (b)(2), substituted “AS

12.55.125(i)

(1) and (2)” for “AS

12.55.125(c)

, (d)(2) – (4), (e)(3) and (4) or (i)”; in (b)(3), substituted “AS

12.55.125(i)

” for “AS

12.55.125(c)

, (d)(2) – (4), (e)(3) and (4), or (i)”; added (b)(8); effective July 12, 2016, repealed (c)(2)(B), (d)(2)(B) and (o); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in the introductory language in (a), deleted “and who has not been released on administrative parole as provided in AS

33.16.089

” following “at least 181 days”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, added (a)(1)(D) and (a)(1)(E), and made a related stylistic change; in (b), added (b)(1)(A), added the (b)(1)(B) designation, substituted “one-half” for “one-third” at the beginning of (b)(1)(B), and added “, for a conviction for an offense not listed in (A) of this paragraph” at the end, deleted former (b)(2), which read, “to a single sentence within or below a presumptive range set out in AS

12.55.125(i)

(1) and (2), and has not been allowed by the three-judge panel under AS

12.55.175

to be considered for discretionary parole release, may not be released on discretionary parole until the prisoner has served the term imposed, less good time earned under AS

33.20.010

;”, redesignated the following paragraphs accordingly, in present (b)(2), substituted “AS

12.55.125(c)

, (d)(2) – (4), (e)(3) and (4), or (i)” for “AS

12.55.125(i)

”, in present (b)(5)(C) and (b)(6)(C), substituted “under (1) – (4) or (7)” for “under (1) – (5)”, and in present (b)(7), substituted “AS

12.55.125(d)

for an offense under AS

11.71.030(a)(2)

or (9)” for “AS

12.55.125(i)(3)

and (4)” and deleted “, after a deduction for good time earned under AS

33.20.010

,” following “prisoner has served.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(b),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to (a) and (b) of this section apply “to sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 33.16.100.
Granting of discretionary parole.

The board may authorize the release of a prisoner who is otherwise eligible under AS

12.55.115

and AS

33.16.090(a)(1)

on discretionary parole if it determines a reasonable probability exists that

the prisoner will live and remain at liberty without violating any laws or conditions imposed by the board;

the prisoner’s rehabilitation and reintegration into society will be furthered by release on parole;

the prisoner will not pose a threat of harm to the public if released on parole; and

release of the prisoner on parole would not diminish the seriousness of the crime.

If the board finds a change in circumstances in a prisoner’s preparole reports listed in AS

33.16.110(a)

, or discovers new information concerning a prisoner who has been granted a parole release date, the board may rescind or revise the previously granted parole release date. In reconsidering the release date, the procedures set out in AS

33.16.130

shall be followed.

[Repealed, § 32 ch 2 SLA 2005.]

[Repealed, § 32 ch 2 SLA 2005.]

[Repealed, § 179 ch 36 SLA 2016.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

When considering a prisoner for release on discretionary parole under AS

33.16.090(a)(2)

, the board may release a prisoner if, taking into consideration the prisoner’s likelihood of recidivism given the prisoner’s age, criminal history, behavior in prison, participation in treatment, and plans for reentering the community, a reasonable probability exists that

the prisoner will live and remain at liberty without violating any laws or conditions imposed by the board;

the prisoner’s rehabilitation and reintegration into society will be furthered by release on parole;

the prisoner will not pose a threat of harm to the public if released on parole; and

release of the prisoner on parole would not diminish the seriousness of the crime.

If the board considers an application for discretionary parole and denies parole because the prisoner does not meet the standards in (a) or (g) of this section, the board may make the prisoner ineligible for further consideration of discretionary parole or require that additional time be served before the prisoner is again eligible for consideration for discretionary parole.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 77 SLA 1987; am §§ 29, 32 ch 2 SLA 2005; am §§ 125 — 127, 179 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 50 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§
108, 109, 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For eligibility for discretionary parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 1.

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

For discretionary parole release procedures, see 22 AAC 20, art. 6.

For mandatory parole release and revocation, see 22 AAC 20, art. 7.

For parole rescission hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 9.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(m)(4) — (6), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), inserted “convicted of an unclassified felony who is otherwise eligible under AS

12.55.115

and AS

33.16.090(a)(1)

” following “release of a prisoner”; in (b), substituted “preparole reports listed in AS

33.16.110(a)

” for “parole release plan submitted under AS

33.16.130(a)

” and “AS

33.16.130

” for “AS

33.16.130(b)

and (c)”; repealed (e); added (f) and (g).

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (f), deleted “and has not been released on administrative parole under AS

33.16.089

,” preceding “unless the board”, and made a related change.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, in (a), deleted “convicted of an unclassified felony” following “release of a prisoner” in the introductory paragraph; repealed (f); and added (h).

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(h),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to parole granted on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Section 142(f),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 enactment of (h) of this section applies “to parole ordered on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 33.16.110.
Preparole reports.

In determining whether a prisoner is suitable for discretionary parole, the board shall consider the preparole reports including

the presentence report made to the sentencing court;

the recommendations made by the sentencing court, by the prosecuting attorney, and by the defense attorney, and any statements made by the victim or the prisoner at sentencing;

the prisoner’s institutional conduct history while incarcerated;

recommendations made by the staff of the correctional facilities in which the prisoner was incarcerated;

reports of prior crimes, juvenile histories, and previous experiences of the prisoner on parole or probation;

physical, mental, and psychiatric examinations of the prisoner;

information submitted by the prisoner, the sentencing court, the victim of the crime, the prosecutor, or other persons having knowledge of the prisoner or the crime;

information concerning an unjustified disparity in the sentence imposed on a prisoner in relation to other sentences imposed under similar circumstances;

the case plan created under AS

33.30.011(a)(8)

for the prisoner, including a compliance report on the case plan;

a reentry plan created under AS

33.30.011(a)(9)

; and

other relevant information that may be reasonably available.

The board shall provide information available under (a)(3) and (a)(6) of this section when requesting comments on the discretionary parole of a prisoner from the sentencing court.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 128 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For parole progress reports, see 22 AAC 20, art. 3.

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), added (9), (10), and (11); and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 33.16.120.
Rights of certain victims in connection with parole.

If the victim of a crime against a person or arson in the first degree requests notice of a scheduled hearing to review or consider discretionary parole for a prisoner convicted of that crime, the board shall send notice of the hearing to the victim at least 30 days before the hearing. The notice must be accompanied by a copy of the prisoner’s parole plan submitted to the board. However, the copy of the parole plan sent to the victim may not include the prisoner’s confidential health information, information protected under AS

33.16.170

, proposed residence, or employment addresses.

A victim who requests notice under this section shall maintain a current, valid mailing address on file with the board. The board shall send the notice required by this section to the last known address of the victim. The victim’s address may not be disclosed to the prisoner or the prisoner’s attorney.

The victim has a right to attend meetings of the parole board in which the status of the prisoner convicted of the crime against that victim is officially considered and to comment, in writing or in person, on the proposed action of the board. Copies of any written comments shall be provided to the prisoner and the prisoner’s attorney before action by the board.

The board shall consider the comments presented under (c) of this section in deciding whether to release the prisoner on parole.

If the victim requests, the board shall make every reasonable effort to notify the victim as soon as practicable in writing of its decision to grant or deny discretionary parole or to release the prisoner under AS

33.16.010(c)

. The notice under this subsection must include the expected date of the prisoner’s release, the geographic area in which the prisoner is required to reside, and other pertinent information concerning the prisoner’s conditions of parole that may affect the victim.

Upon request of the victim, if a prisoner is released under AS

33.16.010(c)

or

33.16.090

, the board shall make every reasonable effort to notify the victim before the prisoner’s release date. Notification under this subsection must include the expected date of the prisoner’s release, the geographic area in which the prisoner is required to reside, and other pertinent information concerning the prisoner’s conditions of parole that may affect the victim.

A victim of a crime involving domestic violence or of a sexual assault under AS

11.41.410

-

11.41.427

shall be informed by the board at least 30 days in advance of a scheduled hearing to review or consider parole for a prisoner. The board shall inform the victim of any decision to grant or deny parole or to release the prisoner under AS

33.16.010(c)

. If the prisoner is to be released, the victim shall be notified of the expected date of the release, the geographic area in which the prisoner will reside, and any other information concerning conditions of parole that may affect the victim. The victim shall also be informed of any changes in the conditions of parole that may affect the victim. The board shall send the notice required to the last known address of the victim. A person may not bring a civil action for damages for a failure to comply with the provisions of this subsection.

[Repealed, § 27 ch 13 SLA 2017.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; am §§ 12 — 15 ch 59 SLA 1989; am § 51 ch 64 SLA 1996; am §§
129 — 132 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 27 ch 13 SLA 2017; am § 51 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For rights of victims generally, see AS 12.61.

Administrative Code. —

For attendance and appearance at parole board adjudicatory hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 2.

For parole progress reports, see 22 AAC 20, art. 3.

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

For mandatory parole release and revocation, see 22 AAC 20, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “parole plan submitted to the board” for “application for parole submitted under AS

33.16.130(a)

” and “parole plan” for “application”; inserted “confidential health information, information protected under AS

33.16.170

,” following “prisoner’s”; in (f), inserted “33.16.089, or

33.16.090

” preceding “the board shall”; in (g), inserted “or of a sexual assault under AS

11.41.410

–

11.41.427

” following “domestic violence”; deleted “discretionary” in two places – following “review or consider” and “grant or deny”, respectively; added (h); and made a minor stylistic change.

The first 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, repealed (h).

The second 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (f), deleted “, 33.16.089,” in the list of statutory citations.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Under this section, all family members who meet the statutory definition of “victim” in this chapter are entitled to be present during all parole board hearings concerning the perpetrator and to comment on the proposed board action. May 24, 1996, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 33.16.130.
Parole procedures.

A prisoner eligible for discretionary parole may apply to the board for discretionary parole. As part of the application for parole, the prisoner shall submit to the board a parole release plan that includes information concerning the prisoner’s plan for employment, residence, and rehabilitation if released on parole.

Before the board determines a prisoner’s suitability for discretionary parole, the prisoner is entitled to a hearing before the board. The commissioner or the commissioner’s designee shall furnish to the prisoner a copy of the preparole reports listed in AS

33.16.110(a)

, and the prisoner shall be permitted access to all records that the board will consider in making its decision except those that are made confidential by law. The prisoner may also respond in writing to all materials the board considers, be present at the hearing, and present evidence to the board.

If the board denies parole, the board shall state the reasons for the denial, identify all of the factors considered relevant to the denial, and provide a written plan for addressing all of the factors relevant to the denial. The board may schedule a subsequent parole hearing at the time of the denial or at a later date.

The board shall issue its decision in writing and provide a copy of the decision to the prisoner.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1985; § 133 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§ 52, 53 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§
110, 111 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(d)(11), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (c), see sec. 75(d), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For attendance and appearance at parole board adjudicatory hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 2.

For parole progress reports, see 22 AAC 20, art. 3.

For discretionary parole release hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 4.

For discretionary parole release procedures, see 22 AAC 20, art. 6.

For parole rescission hearings, see 22 AAC 20, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in the introductory language in (a), deleted the second sentence, which read, “The board shall also hold a hearing if requested by a victim under procedures established for the request for a prisoner eligible for administrative parole.”, and in (a)(1), deleted “, unless the prisoner is eligible for administrative parole” at the end; deleted (c)(1) and (2), setting specific time frames for scheduling of subsequent parole hearings.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, repealed and reenacted (a); and added the first sentence in (b).

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(f),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the repeal and reenactment of (a) of this section and the amendment of (b) of this section apply “to parole ordered on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”